Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8252.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 16-59-9.3 of the General Laws in Chapter 16-59 entitled "Council on
Postsecondary Education [See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]"
is hereby amended to read as follows:
16-59-9.3. Student Success Act.
Notwithstanding any other provision of the general or public laws:
(1) A Any student, other than a nonimmigrant alien within the meaning of 8 U.S.C. §
1101(a)(15), who meets all of the following requirements shall be exempt from paying nonresident
tuition at Rhode Island public universities, colleges, or community colleges, if he or she the student:
(i) Attended an approved Rhode Island high school for three (3) two (2)or more consecutive
years;
(ii) Continues to reside in the state of Rhode Island;
(iii) Has graduated from an approved Rhode Island high school or received a high school
equivalency diploma from the state of Rhode Island; and
(iv) Has filed, or will file, upon matriculation, with the Rhode Island public university,
college, or community college of expected attendance, an affidavit stating that:
(A) The the student meets the requirements of subsections (1)(i) and (1)(ii) through (1)(iii)
of this section; and
(B) If the student is not a United States citizen and does not have a lawful immigration
status, that the student has filed an application for lawful immigration status, or will file the

application as soon as the student is eligible to do so. The affidavit shall not require students to
reveal their immigration or citizenship status.
(2) Any nonimmigrant foreign national student, who has resided in Rhode Island for three
(3) years and has attended a Rhode Island high school for three (3) years, will be eligible to pay the
same in-state tuition as any other Rhode Island student.
(3)(2) Identifiable student information obtained pursuant to subsection (1) of this section
shall be confidential to the extent provided by state and federal law (including the federal Family
Educational Rights and Privacy Act (FERPA)). If information obtained pursuant to this section
regarding a student’s immigration status is provided to any agency for purposes other than the
implementation of this section, the entity providing the information shall promptly notify the
student.
(4)(3) The Rhode Island council for postsecondary education shall prescribe rules and
regulations as may be necessary for the implementation of this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
========
LC005981
========
LC005981 - Page 2 of 3